Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-304] Disclosure of qualification
for tax benefits. (a) Every policy that is intended to be a qualified
long-term care insurance contract as provided in the federal Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended, shall be
identified as such by prominently displaying and printing on page one of the
policy form and the outline of coverage and in the application the following
words: "This contract for long-term care insurance is intended to be a
federally qualified long-term care insurance contract and may qualify you for
federal and state tax benefits."

(b) Every policy that is not intended to be a
qualified long-term care insurance contract as provided in the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended,
shall be identified as such by prominently displaying and printing on page one
of the policy form and the outline of coverage and in the application the
following words: "This contract for long-term care insurance is not
intended to be a federally qualified long-term care insurance contract and is
not intended to qualify you for federal and state tax benefits." [L 1999,
c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next